Massachusetts, session 194th, H2161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 148 of Chapter 149 shall be amended by inserting the following section:
Any employer paying wages to an employee by any means other than check or draft must
make check or draft options available for the paid wages without charge by deduction from the
face amount thereof or otherwise.
of 1